California statutes. Insurance Code
(b) Contracts accepting such reinsurance shall be entered into between the ceding insurer and the reinsuring reciprocal or interinsurance exchange by its attorney in fact. The ceding insurer need not become a member of or a subscriber to the reinsuring reciprocal or interinsurance exchange and such contracts of reinsurance may contain any or all of the terms and conditions customary in reinsurances of the classes of insurance covered.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 504.)
-------------------------------------------

1313.

Nothing in Chapter 504 of the Statutes of 1965 shall limit or affect the right of an admitted foreign reciprocal or interinsurance exchange to accept reinsurance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1805.)
-------------------------------------------

1314.

Any reciprocal or interinsurance exchange, domestic or foreign, which has obtained a certificate of surplus under Section 1401, and whose subscribers by such order have no liability for assessment, may issue a policy of insurance required under Article 4 (commencing with Section 11620) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 2 of this code without requiring such insured to become a member of or a subscriber to such reciprocal or interinsurance exchange.

The attorney-in-fact, agent, or other representatives duly authorized and acting for the regular subscribers of such reciprocal or interinsurance exchange, shall have the same power and authority to act for any such person becoming an insured under Article 4 (commencing with Section 11620) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 2 of this code as authorized or required under any documents required to be filed with the commissioner under Article 3 (commencing with Section 1320) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 1 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 103.)
-------------------------------------------

1315.

A reciprocal exchange or interinsurance exchange may borrow money to defray the expenses of its organization, provide it with surplus funds, or for any purpose of its business, upon a written agreement that the money is required to be repaid only out of the exchange’s surplus in excess of that stipulated in the agreement. The agreement may provide for fixed or variable interest not exceeding an amount allowed by the commissioner, which interest shall or shall not constitute a liability of the exchange as to its funds other than the excess that is stipulated in the agreement. Any agreement of this type shall provide that all interest payments and principal repayments require prior approval by the commissioner. Unless otherwise approved by the commissioner, written agreements evidencing this borrowed money shall not be issued in units of less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000). Unless otherwise allowed by the commissioner, no commission or promotion expense shall be paid in connection with any loan of this type. An agreement to borrow money to provide surplus funds, or for any business purpose, may be termed a surplus note. No surplus note or other agreement may be issued unless it conforms to the requirements set forth at the time the note is issued in the Accounting Practices and Procedures Manual adopted by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners for the reporting of agreements as surplus and not as debt in the financial statements required to be filed by an insurer with the commissioner. No permit or other agreement shall constitute authorization or approval for any other issuance of securities that is connected to the note or agreement in any way.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 4, Sec. 1.   Effective January 21, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Filing of Documents [1320. - 1330.]

1320.

The attorney of every admitted reciprocal or interinsurance exchange shall verify and cause to be filed with the commissioner copies of the following forms used by the exchange:

(a) The form of every amendment to, revision of, or substitution for the power of attorney in use at the time of admission.

(b) The form of each application for insurance and the form of each contract for exchange of indemnity which would have to be filed with or approved by the commissioner if such insurer were a capital stock insurer, including where applicable the rates to be used therewith.

(c) Every amendment, revision or replacement of forms described in subdivision (b).

(d) Such other specific forms of applications for insurance or specific contracts for exchange of indemnity as the commissioner may from time to time by written order require be filed.

The commissioner may disapprove of any form filed in accordance with this section if:

(1) It be contrary to law, or

(2) He finds it contains any material which is unintelligible, uncertain, unfair, ambiguous, or obtuse, or likely to mislead a person to whom the form is offered, delivered, or issued.

The procedure for such disapproval shall be that specified in Section 12957 for withdrawal of approval of previously approved forms of other insurers.

It shall be unlawful for such insurer to use any such form after such disapproval has become final.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1728.)
-------------------------------------------

1321.

If the name of the exchange does not contain either the words “interinsurance,” “reciprocal” or “exchange,” then such forms shall have printed under such name the words “an interinsurance exchange” in a prominent place on each of such forms.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1322.

The attorney prior to admission shall file with the commissioner a declaration verified by his oath or, where such attorney is a corporation, by the oath of its duly authorized officers. Such declaration shall set forth or have annexed thereto:

(a) The name of the attorney and the name under which contracts are to be made.

(b) The location of the principal office of the exchange.

(c) The classes of insurance to be exchanged.

(d) A copy of each form of policy under or by which insurance is to be exchanged.

(e) A copy of the form of the power of attorney or agreement under and by which such insurance is to be exchanged.

(f) A statement that executed contracts or bona fide applications, to be concurrently effective, have been made for the exchange of indemnities by at least 100 separate subscribers, except that such statement shall not be required for organizations operating pursuant to Section 1284.

(g) In the case of employer’s liability or workmen’s compensation insurance, a statement that there have been executed contracts or bona fide applications, to be concurrently effective, representing annual payroll having a total of not less than one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(h) A statement that there are in the possession of such attorney subject to the supervision of the advisory board, assets conforming to the requirements of Article 5 of this chapter.

(i) A financial statement under oath in the form prescribed by the commissioner for the annual statement.

(j) The instrument authorizing service of process as provided in this chapter. 

(k) A certificate showing any deposits of funds or securities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 904.)
-------------------------------------------

1323.

Concurrently with the filing of the declaration provided for by the terms of section 1322 the attorney shall file with the commissioner an instrument in writing executed by him, providing that after the issuance of the certificate of authority actions against the exchange may be brought either in the county in which the person or property insured is located, or in which the exchange has its principal office or place of business in the State; and also providing that service of process may be had upon the attorney-in-fact or upon the commissioner in suits against the exchange.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1324.

Except as provided in Section 1330, the attorney, concurrently with the filing of the declaration provided for in Section 1322, also shall file with the commissioner a bond, approved by the commissioner, in favor of the people of the State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 578.)
-------------------------------------------

1325.

Such bond shall be executed by the attorney with an admitted surety insurer as surety.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 578.)
-------------------------------------------

1325.5.

Such attorney may deposit with the commissioner, in lieu of the bond executed by him, securities of a value equal to the required amount of the bond and of the kinds set forth in sections 1170 and 1240. Such deposit shall be subject to the provisions of Article 11, Chapter 1, Part 2, Division 1, of this code. Such deposit shall be subject to levy of execution upon judgments against the attorney.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 732.)
-------------------------------------------

1326.

The attorney’s bond shall be in the penal sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), conditioned that the attorney will faithfully account for all moneys and other property which come into his or her hands or are handled by him or her under the terms of the power of attorney and the rules of the exchange, and that the attorney will neither withdraw nor cause to be withdrawn nor appropriate for his or her own use, from the funds of the exchange, anything of value to which he or she is not entitled under the terms of the power of attorney and the rules.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 282.)
-------------------------------------------

1327.

The attorney’s bond may be sued upon in one and the same action either by any subscriber or any number of subscribers suffering loss through a violation of its conditions or by the receiver or trustee in liquidation of the exchange. Liability thereunder may be enforced by any one or more of such parties.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1328.

Any amount recovered on the attorney’s bond shall be deposited in and become a part of the funds of the exchange.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1329.

Where provision is made, by the power of attorney executed by the subscribers or the rules adopted by the exchange, for the bonding of the attorney-in-fact against fraud and dishonesty with a bond executed as prescribed in Section 1325 and conditioned as provided by this chapter and in a penal sum at least equal to the amount set forth in Section 1326, such bond may be filed with the commissioner in lieu of any other bond required by this chapter and shall be actionable in similar manner and for similar purposes as such other bond.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 578.)
-------------------------------------------

1330.

Where the home office of an exchange is located outside of this State and the attorney files such a bond in the home State, there may be filed with the commissioner, in lieu of such bond, either a certified copy or duplicate thereof or an affidavit from the insurance authority of the home State to the effect that such a bond has been filed with it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Certificate of Authority [1350. - 1350.5.]

1350.

The commissioner shall issue a certificate of authority to the attorney upon compliance with the requirements of this chapter, and the payment of the application fee prescribed by Article 3 (commencing with Section 699) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1. The certificate shall authorize the making, by the attorney, of contracts of insurance under this chapter. It shall also specify all of the following:

(a) The classes of insurance to be effected.

(b) The name of the attorney.

(c) The location of the principal office.

(d) The name under which the contracts of insurance are issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 142, Sec. 85.)
-------------------------------------------

1350.5.

In the event of substitution of attorney or a change in any of the matters specified in the certificate of authority pursuant to Section 1350, the attorney shall apply to the commissioner for an amended certificate of authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 495.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Finances [1370. - 1375.]

1370.

Every exchange shall maintain its required assets in any one, or more, or all of the following forms:

(a) In cash or deposits in solvent banks.

(b) Invested in securities of the kind designated for the investment of assets of incorporated insurers having a capital stock by the laws of the state where the principal office is located.

(c) Invested in real property acquired by or for it to secure the payment of loans heretofore contracted or for moneys heretofore due,
 or purchased at sales upon deeds of trust or upon judgments obtained for the loans or debts, or conveyed to it in satisfaction of debts heretofore contracted in the course of its dealings. The real property may be acquired, held, and conveyed on behalf of the exchange in trust by the attorney, but shall be sold and disposed of within five years after acquisition of title thereto unless the time for any such sale or disposal is extended by the commissioner in writing.

(d) Excess fund investments may be made in real estate and in making improvements thereon for business or residential purposes as an investment for the production of income. “Business or residential purposes” does not include real estate primarily intended for use or valued as agricultural, horticultural, farm, ranch, or mineral property. Any such investment may be made only by admitted exchanges having admitted assets aggregating in value not less than twenty-five million dollars
 ($25,000,000). Real estate acquired and improvements made thereon shall not exceed an amount equal to 5 percent of the admitted assets of the exchange. Any investment in a single parcel of real estate including improvements thereon made under the authority of this subdivision shall not be made in an amount in excess of 1 percent of the admitted assets of the exchange. The percentage or dollar value of assets as provided in this subdivision shall be determined by the exchange’s last preceding annual statement of conditions and affairs made as of the December 31 last preceding and which has been filed with the commissioner pursuant to law.

(e) In addition to the investments authorized by subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, every exchange may purchase, hold, or reconvey real estate for any of the following purposes:

(1) The building, and the land upon which that building stands,
 owned by it and in which is located its home office or principal office in this state by virtue of the occupancy thereof, in whole or in part, by its attorney-in-fact. The exchange may make any type of arrangement which is fair and reasonable for the occupation of the building, in whole or in part, by its attorney.

(2) Real estate requisite for its accommodation in the convenient transaction of its business.

(f) Subject to the limitations established under subdivisions (c), (d), and (e), every exchange in its own name as in the case of an individual, may purchase, receive, own, hold, lease, mortgage, pledge, or encumber, by deed of trust or otherwise, manage, and sell real estate for the purposes and objects of the exchange.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 106, Sec. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

1370.2.

Except as in this article (commencing with Section 1370) otherwise provides, every exchange subject to this chapter (commencing with Section 1280) shall on and after October 1, 1961, be governed for all purposes as to required minimum surplus, (including that for admission, amendment of certificate of authority and solvency) by the same standards for minimum paid-in capital and surplus applicable to capital stock insurers. As used in this chapter surplus of an exchange is the amount by which its assets exceed a sum sufficient to discharge all its liabilities. When the standard prescribed for capital stock insurers consists of an amount of minimum paid-in capital the minimum
 surplus required of the exchange shall be such amount, and when the standard prescribed for capital stock insurers consists of an amount of minimum paid-in capital and an amount of surplus the minimum surplus required of the exchange shall be the aggregate of such amounts.

This section shall not affect the provisions of Section 1401.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 454.)
-------------------------------------------

1370.4.

An exchange admitted prior to October 1, 1961, shall be exempt from the provisions of Section 1370.2 until it replaces its attorney in fact, except when the replacement is in strict compliance with a contract between the exchange and its current attorney in fact entered into prior to October 1, 1961, or the effective legal control of its attorney in fact passes, by means other than by way of judicial process (including but not limited to: probate proceedings, bankruptcy proceedings or an action by a dissident minority interest to force a sale or partition of the attorney in fact) to persons none of whom had a proprietary interest therein on October 1, 1961, subject to the
 further provisions of this section and to the provisions of Section 1370.8.

While exempted from the provisions of Section 1370.2 as modified by Section 1370.8, such an exchange shall be subject to and comply with the surplus requirements provided in this chapter (commencing with Section 1280) immediately prior to October 1, 1961.

The exemption from Section 1370.2 provided by this section shall be progressively abolished so that on and after the dates specified in the left-hand column of the following table every exchange shall be required to maintain at least a minimum surplus equal to that percentage of the minimum paid-in capital required by this code of capital stock insurers transacting the same classes of insurance which is set forth in the right-hand column of the following table.January 1, 1967 20%January 1, 1970 40%January 1, 1973 70%January 1, 1976100%In a case where the provisions of Section 1370.8 become applicable any additional minimum surplus required by that section shall be in addition to any required under the provisions of this paragraph.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 181.)
-------------------------------------------

1370.8.

Any exchange exempted at any time from the provisions of Section 1370. 2 shall irrespective of such exemption be subject to the provisions of this section. No amended certificate of authority adding classes of insurance shall be issued to the attorney in fact of any such exchange on or after October 1, 1961, unless at the time of the amendment the exchange has a surplus equal in the aggregate to the sum of the surplus amount it was required to maintain by the provisions of this chapter (commencing with Section 1280) as the same were in effect immediately prior to October 1, 1961, plus the aggregate amount of additional minimum amount of capital and surplus which, at the time
 of such amendment, would be required of a capital stock insurer by the provisions of this code in order to add the same classes of insurance to its certificate of authority if it were authorized at the time of the amendment to transact the same classes of insurance as those which the attorney in fact of such reciprocal is authorized to transact.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 454.)
-------------------------------------------

1371.

If an exchange does either liability or workers’ compensation insurance, it shall at all times maintain assets in a sum sufficient to discharge all liabilities and to provide a surplus over all liabilities of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

An exchange subject to the provisions of this section is also subject to the provisions of Sections 1370.2, 1370.4, and 1370.8.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 231, Sec. 7.   (AB 2045)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1372.

Every other exchange shall maintain at all times assets in a sum sufficient to discharge all liabilities and to provide a surplus over all liabilities of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

An exchange subject to the provisions of this section is also subject to the provisions of Sections 1370.2, 1370.4, and 1370.8.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 454.)
-------------------------------------------

1373.1.

No certificate of authority, other than a renewal certificate of authority, shall be issued to the attorney within three years from and after the time when the exchange commences business as an insurer nor within three years from and after the time it is first organized unless assets equal to the sum of its liabilities and the minimum surplus required by this chapter are maintained in cash or one or more of the following:

(a) Securities specified in Sections 1170 to 1175 inclusive;

(b) Bonds specified in Section 1176, if such bonds are legal for
 investment of savings banks in this State;

(c) Such securities specified in Sections 1178 to 1202, inclusive, as are legal for investment of savings banks in this State;

(d) Premiums in course of collection, or agents’ balances representing premiums, on policies effected not more than 90 days prior to the date on which such premiums or balances are valued for the purposes of this section, and earned service fees receivable, not over 90 days due, and evidences of debt representing such assets;

(e) Interest accrued and dividends declared, receivable on any of the assets specified in subsections (a) to (d), inclusive, no part of which interest or dividends has been due in excess of one year;

(f) Amount of reinsurance recoverable from admitted
 insurers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 544.)
-------------------------------------------

1373.2.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) hereof, an exchange, the attorney for which holds a certificate of authority, which has been in business as an insurer less than three years from and after the time when it commenced business as an insurer shall maintain its assets during the balance of such three-year period in the type of assets specified in Section 1373.1, excepting such of its assets as are in excess of the sum of its liabilities and the surplus required for issuance of a certificate of authority, other than a renewal certificate of authority. Upon its failure so to do the commissioner may revoke the certificate of authority. The proceedings
 shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the commissioner shall have all the powers granted therein.

(b) This section shall not apply to an exchange, the attorney for which holds a certificate of authority on the effective date hereof, until January 1, 1954.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 544.)
-------------------------------------------

1374.

In estimating the financial condition of any exchange the commissioner shall observe the following rules:

(a) He or she shall charge as liabilities the same reserves as are required of incorporated insurers issuing nonassessable policies on a reserve basis.

(b) Surplus deposits of subscribers shall not be charged as a liability.

(c) All premium deposits and surplus deposits of subscribers due and unpaid for a period not exceeding 90 days shall be allowed as admitted
 assets, as in the case of incorporated insurers issuing nonassessable policies on a reserve basis. 

(d) An assessment levied as provided in this chapter, and not collected shall in no event be allowed as an asset.

(e) The computation of reserves shall be based upon premium deposits without any deduction for the compensation of the attorney.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 564, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1374.1.

(a) “Surplus deposits of subscribers,” as used in this chapter, means amounts, over and above any premium charges, which are contributed by subscribers and which are used for the purpose of funding the surplus of a reciprocal or interinsurance exchange. No subscriber shall have a secured or preferred claim against any of the assets of the reciprocal or interinsurance exchange arising out of surplus deposits. All assets, including the surplus deposits, shall be held by the reciprocal or interinsurance exchange and made available for payment of claims of policyholders and creditors of the reciprocal or interinsurance exchange in
 preference to any claim for withdrawal by a subscriber. A subscriber may, upon withdrawal from membership and cancellation of all such insurance contracts held by the subscriber with the insurer, withdraw the amount of the subscriber’s surplus deposits, less such surrender charges as may be deducted pursuant to the subscriber’s or insured’s agreement, but only if the subscriber has given written notice to the attorney-in-fact at least 60 days in advance of the withdrawal.

(b) Withdrawal of surplus deposits of subscribers shall not be permitted if, as a result of the withdrawal, the policyholder’s surplus of the exchange would be less than the capital and surplus required by Sections 700.01, 700.02, and 700. 025.

(c) Withdrawal of surplus deposits of subcribers shall not be permitted after an order of conservation or liquidation of, or the appointment of a conservator or liquidator
 for, any such reciprocal or interinsurance exchange.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 564, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1375.

Where the subscribers are grouped by industries or otherwise under any ruling or agreement which exempts the funds of one group from liability in whole or in part for the payment of losses or expenses chargeable against another group, each such independent group shall maintain the reserves and surplus required for a separate exchange and the requirements of subdivisions (f) and (g) of section 1322 relative to the number and amount of risks to be assumed must be observed as to each group.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Assessment of Insurers [1390. - 1402.]

1390.

The provisions of this article shall apply only to exchanges writing liability, common carrier liability, or workers’ compensation insurance, except that any exchange may apply for and receive the certificate provided for by Section 1401.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 231, Sec. 8.   (AB 2045)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1391.

Whenever an exchange subject to this article, is not possessed of admitted assets sufficient to discharge all liabilities and to maintain the required surplus, the attorney may make an assessment for the amount, subject to the limits provided by this article, needed to make up the deficiency. If the attorney fails to make the assessment within 30 days after the commissioner orders him to do so, the commissioner may make the assessment. If liquidation of such an exchange is ordered, the assessment may be levied for such an amount, subject to limits provided by this article, as the commissioner determines to be necessary to discharge all liabilities of the exchange, including the reasonable cost of liquidation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1347.)
-------------------------------------------

1392.

Except as provided by Sections 1397, 1398, 1400 and 1401, every subscriber of an exchange subject to this article shall be liable to pay, and shall pay, his proportionate part of any such assessment, in accordance with law and his contract covering any such deficiency assessment (a) if he is notified by either the attorney or the commissioner of intention to levy such assessment within one year after the expiration or cancellation of his policy, or, (b) if an order appointing a conservator or liquidator of such exchange is entered, within one year after such expiration or cancellation.

The period to be covered by the assessment shall be the period of one year immediately preceding (a) the date of notification by either the attorney or the commissioner of the intention to levy such assessment, or, (b) the date of entry of an order appointing a conservator or liquidator of such exchange, as the case may require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1941, Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

1393.

Each such subscriber’s share of the deficiency for which an assessment is made pursuant to this article, shall be determined by applying to the premium earned on the member’s policy or policies during the period to be covered by the assessment, the ratio of the total deficiency to the total premiums earned during such period, upon all policies subject to such assessment. For the purpose of this section, premium earned is to be calculated upon the basis of the amount of the consideration for which the policy is issued, without the deduction of attorney-in-fact fees, policy fees, or other charges, excepting charges which do not recur upon the renewal or extension of the policy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 934.)
-------------------------------------------

1394.

Subscribers liable to assessment under this article shall pay the same without offsetting any claim for unearned premiums or losses payable to or for the account of the subscriber.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1395.

Assessments under this article shall be made upon the members liable to assessment therefor, in proportion to their several liabilities.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1396.

Notice of all such proposed assessments shall be filed with the commissioner and the assessments shall not take effect until approved by him after such investigation as he deems necessary.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1397.

Assessments under this article, whether levied by the attorney, or the commissioner in the liquidation of such an exchange or otherwise, shall be of no greater amount than specified in the power of attorney.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1398.

The power of attorney of an exchange subject to this article may limit the contingent liability of the subscriber for assessment, but such contingent liability shall not be less than an amount equal to and in addition to the amount of the premium deposit provided in the policy.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1399.

Each subscriber to an exchange subject to this article may maintain with the exchange, in addition to the premium deposit provided in the policy, a further deposit to be held as the surplus deposit of such subscriber.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1937, Ch. 727.)
-------------------------------------------

1400.

Each such subscriber maintaining a surplus deposit equal to, and in addition to, the amount of the total current annual premium deposit provided in his policy, shall have no liability for assessment during the period such surplus deposit is so maintained.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1401.

If an exchange has a surplus of admitted assets over all liabilities in a sum equal to 112 times the minimum paid-in capital required of incorporated insurers issuing policies on a reserve basis and doing the same classes of insurance, then the Insurance Commissioner, upon written request, shall issue his certificate stating such fact. Subscribers at an exchange so certified shall have no liability for assessment on policies issued while such certificate remains in effect. Whenever the commissioner finds such fact does not exist, he shall revoke and require the surrender of his certificate. Upon revocation of such certificate no policy shall thereafter be issued nor be permitted to remain in force beyond the date fixed for the next payment of premium without written endorsement thereon providing for assessment liability in accordance with the terms of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1131, Sec. 9.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 29 of Ch. 1401.)
-------------------------------------------

1401.5.

(a) When the commissioner finds after a public hearing that a reciprocal or interinsurance exchange has at all times during any consecutive five-year period terminating on December 31, 1964, or on the last day of any subsequent calendar year, as shown by its annual statements, as filed or as adjusted by the commissioner, as the case may be, maintained a surplus of admitted assets over all liabilities of at least three million dollars ($3,000,000) the commissioner may make an order that the reciprocal or interinsurance exchange need not obtain the certificate provided in Section 1401 and that its subscribers shall thereafter in perpetuity have no liability for assessment on policies issued or renewed at any time after that order becomes final or may, if the reciprocal desires not to become
 nonassessable, issue a certificate of capability to reinsure. To request the order, the reciprocal or interinsurance exchange shall file a petition with the commissioner, on a form prescribed by the commissioner. The filing fee for the petition shall be five hundred sixty-seven dollars ($567). The commissioner shall give notice of the hearing in the insurance press and in any other ways as he or she deems advisable and to the extent he or she deems advisable. That order is subject to the provisions of Section 12940 and any person with sufficient relevant interest shall be authorized to bring any permitted action thereunder.

(b) When the order of the commissioner becomes final any domestic reciprocal or interinsurance exchange obtaining that order shall no longer be subject to or entitled to the benefits of: subdivision (c) of Section 1307, subdivision (b) of Section 1374, and Article 6 (commencing with Section 1390) of this chapter.

(c) At the time all reciprocal or interinsurance exchanges conducting insurance business in this state are by law governed for all purposes as to required minimum surplus (including that for admission, amendment of certificate of authority, and solvency) by the same standards for minimum paid-in capital and surplus as are then applicable to capital stock insurers, any domestic reciprocal or interinsurance exchange may obtain the order provided in subdivision (a), subject to the provisions in subdivision (a) by showing that it has maintained the minimum paid-in capital and surplus requirement applicable to capital stock insurers for at least five consecutive years in lieu of the three million dollars ($3,000,000) surplus prescribed in subdivision (a).

(d) If the power of attorney or any policy of any domestic reciprocal or interinsurance exchange obtaining the order provided by
 subdivision (a) contains language directly or indirectly creating a liability for assessment, in respect to policies issued prior to or issued after the order becomes final that power of attorney and all those policies shall be deemed in law to have been amended to delete and repeal any and all of those assessment provisions as of the date that the order becomes final without any further action on the part of the reciprocal or interinsurance exchange, its subscribers, its attorney-in-fact, or the body exercising the subscriber’s rights.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 30.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1402.

All funds of such exchange and the proceeds of the contingent liability of its subscribers shall be available for the payment of any liability of the exchange.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Dividends [1420. - 1420.]

1420.

Savings or credits may be returned to the subscribers irrespective of the source from which such savings or credits accrue whenever such returns do not constitute an impairment of the assets or reserves required to be maintained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 581.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Reports and Examination [1430. - 1434.]

1430.

The attorney shall make a report, under oath, to the commissioner covering each calendar year. Such report shall be made annually during the time limited for the filing of annual statements by insurers transacting the same class of insurance. It shall show the financial condition of the exchange.

The attorney shall at any time furnish such additional information and reports, other than names and addresses of subscribers, as the commissioner requires. The attorney shall not be required to furnish the names or addresses of any subscribers except in case of an unpaid final judgment against the exchange.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1431.

The assets, business affairs and records of every exchange and its attorney shall be subject to examination by the commissioner at any reasonable time. The cost and expense of such examination shall be paid as prescribed in Section 736.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1008.)
-------------------------------------------

1432.

The commissioner has:

(a) The right of examination of and supervision over reciprocal or interinsurance exchanges, their attorneys, agents and brokers.

(b) The right to hold and conduct hearings in the manner and under the same procedure as in the case of other insurers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1433.

The commissioner’s right of examination shall include the right to examine the records containing the names and addresses of the subscribers. Any information obtained from such records shall be confidential and the disclosure thereof, except under order of court, constitutes a breach of official duty.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1434.

Where the principal office of the attorney is located in another State, the commissioner, in lieu of examination may accept a certified copy of the report of examination made by the insurance authority of another State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Suits [1450. - 1453.]

1450.

The exchange may sue or be sued in its own name as in the case of an individual. Any judgment rendered against the exchange shall be binding upon each subscriber only in such proportion as his interests may appear.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1451.

No action shall lie against any subscriber, upon any obligation made or incurred in the name of the exchange, until a final judgment has been obtained against the exchange and remains unsatisfied for thirty days.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1452.

Process may be served upon the commissioner as provided in Article 1 (commencing with Section 12919) of Chapter 2 of Division 3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 949.)
-------------------------------------------

1453.

A judgment rendered in any case where service of process has been made on the commissioner shall be binding against the subscribers as their interests appear.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Policy [1470. - 1470.]